Arkansas, session 2025, HB1563.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-93-1802(2)(B), concerning felony
offenses that fall under the definition of "restricted release felony"
regarding release eligibility and procedures for offenses committed on or
after January 1, 2025, is amended to add an additional subdivision as
follows:
(lvi) Knowingly exposing another person to fentanyl
in the first degree, § 5-13-214(b).





*CEB164*
02/20/2025 12:57:38 PM CEB164